Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1330.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 16, 1986 (P.L.1646, No.188), known as the Chiropractic Practice Act, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 101.1. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Chiropractic is a health profession in this Commonwealth that is subject to regulation and oversight to protect the public health, welfare and safety.(2) It is in the public interest that only a person who meets the qualifications established under this act engage in the practice of chiropractic to maintain public trust and confidence in the profession.Section 101.2. Applicability and construction.(a) Applicability.--This act shall apply to a person who practices chiropractic in this Commonwealth regardless of the person's place of residence or whether a doctor-patient relationship exists.(b) Construction.--This act shall be liberally construed to implement the purposes of this act.Section 2. The definitions of "adjunctive procedures," "chiropractic," "chiropractor" and "manipulation/adjustment" in section 102 are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20260SB1330PN1719 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Adjunctive procedures." [Physical measures such as mechanical stimulation, heat, cold, light, air, water, electricity, sound, massage and mobilization.] A physical measure, physiologic therapeutic program or rehabilitative or exercise program, including active and passive modalities, mechanical stimulation, heat, cold, light, air, water, electricity, sound, massage and mobilization, that a licensee uses to reduce pain or muscle spasm, increase function or mobility, reduce disability or otherwise provide chiropractic care and treatment to a patient."Animal." A living animal other than a human being. "Animal chiropractic." The evaluation and treatment of vertebral or extremity joint dysfunction of an animal through spinal, joint or neuromusculoskeletal manipulative therapy or soft tissue therapy. The term does not include administering, selling, distributing, recommending or providing advice regarding a substance, product or device to restore or maintain the health of an animal, including any of the following:(1) Vitamins.(2) Minerals.(3) Phytonutrients.(4) Antioxidants.(5) Enzymes.(6) Glandular extracts.(7) Botanical substances.(8) Herbal therapies.(9) Homeopathic remedies.(10) Drugs available without a prescription.(11) Durable or nondurable medical goods and devices."Artificial intelligence assisted chiropractic adjustment." 20260SB1330PN1719 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Th e use of artificial intelligence, robotics or a mechatronic system to perform, guide or augment spinal manipulation or a related chiropractic procedure.* * *["Chiropractic." A branch of the healing arts dealing with the relationship between the articulations of the vertebral column, as well as other articulations, and the neuro-musculo-skeletal system and the role of these relationships in the restoration and maintenance of health. The term shall include systems of locating misaligned or displaced vertebrae of the human spine and other articulations; the examination preparatory to the adjustment or manipulation of such misaligned or displaced vertebrae and other articulations; the adjustment or manipulation of such misaligned or displaced vertebrae and other articulations; the furnishing of necessary patient care for the restoration and maintenance of health; and the use of board-approved scientific instruments of analysis, including X-ray. The term shall also include diagnosis, provided that such diagnosis is necessary to determine the nature and appropriateness of chiropractic treatment; the use of adjunctive procedures in treating misaligned or dislocated vertebrae or articulations and related conditions of the nervous system, provided that, after January 1, 1988, the licensee must be certified in accordance with this act to use adjunctive procedures; and nutritional counseling, provided that nothing herein shall be construed to require licensure as a chiropractor in order to engage in nutritional counseling. The term shall not include the practice of obstetrics or gynecology, the reduction of fractures or major dislocations, or the use of drugs or surgery.]20260SB1330PN1719 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Chiropractor." A [practitioner of chiropractic.] person licensed under this act to practice chiropractic. The term includes a person with the title "Doctor of Chiropractic," "Chiropractic Physician," "Doctor of Chiropractic Medicine" or the abbreviation "DC."* * *"Dry needling." A physical intervention that uses a filiform needle to stimulate trigger points to diagnose and treat neuromusculoskeletal pain and functional movement deficits. The term does not include stimulation of auricular points or other points based upon areas of oriental medicine or the practice of acupuncture under the act of February 14, 1986 (P.L.2, No.2), known as the Acupuncture Licensure Act."Licensee." The term shall have the same meaning as chiropractor."Manipulation/adjustment." A passive manual maneuver, also known as chiropractic manipulative treatment or spinal manipulation adjustment, during which a joint complex is carried beyond the normal [physiological] voluntary physiologic range of motion [that are applied] without exceeding the boundaries of anatomical integrity of the joint complex or other articulations and that are intended to result in cavitation of the joint [or], reduce subluxation[.], restore or correct nerve dysfunction or restore or correct musculoskeletal dysfunction. The term includes the following:(1) A grade five joint mobilization or passive manual m aneuver performed by hand or with the aid of a mechanical instrument or an artificial intelligence assisted chiropractic adjustment in which a joint complex may be carried beyond the normal voluntary physiologic range of 20260SB1330PN1719 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 motion into the paraphysiologic space without exceeding the boundaries of anatomical integrity. For the purpose of this paragraph, the grade five joint mobilization or passive manual maneuver may, but need not, result in an audible release.(2) A thrust, that is, a brief, sudden and carefully administered impulsion delivered at the end of the normal passive range of movement. For the purpose of this paragraph, the thrust technique may be low velocity or high velocit y. "Practice of chiropractic." As follows: (1) The science, philosophy and art of examination, diagnosis, manipulation/adjustment and treatment of a human being of any age and an animal by methods and analyses commonly taught in an accredited chiropractic college or program or a chiropractic college or program approved by the board. The term includes all of the following: (i) Utilization review, peer review, organization review, impairment rating review and a review involving the determination or assessment of the necessity of chiropractic care and treatment.(ii) The authority to diagnose, order diagnostic and laboratory testing, analyze test results and treat a patient by any of the following:(A) Manipulative, manual, neuromuscular, mechanical, nutritional and dietary methods, lifestyle modification, chiropractic physiotherapy, therapeutic exercise and rehabilitative procedures.(B) The use of supportive appliances and the prescription and use of durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics and supplies.20260SB1330PN1719 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Board-approved scientific instruments of analysis, including diagnostic imaging.(D) Nutritional supplements and venipuncture.(iii) The use of adjunctive procedures, dry needling, a sports physical examination and animal chiropractic if the licensee is certified under this act to perform the service.(iv) Manipulation under anesthesia if the chiropractor has received formal training and is certified by an accredited certification board and performs the manipulation under anesthesia in the presence of a medical doctor or doctor of osteopathic medicine licensed in this Commonwealth.(2) The term does not include operative surgery, the reduction of a fracture or major dislocation, obstetrics, gynecology, osteopathy, podiatry or the administration or prescription of a drug requiring a registration issued by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration."Sports physical examination." The initial physical clearance examination of an athlete to determine whether the athlete is physically capable of engaging in the athletic activity for which the athlete seeks the examination . Section 3. Section 302 of the act is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 302. Powers and duties.The board shall have powers and duties as follows:* * *(14) To establish standards of practice and codes of conduct pertaining to the practice of chiropractic.(15) To establish health, safety and public protection 20260SB1330PN1719 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standards for the ownership and operation of a chiropractic office, clinic or facility.(16) To publicize qualifying disciplinary action and other pertinent action taken by the board.Section 4. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 305. Certification to perform dry needling.(a) Certification required.--The board shall certify a qualified licensee to perform dry needling in accordance with this section. A licensee may not perform dry needling unless the board has issued the licensee a certification under this section.(b) Application.--To obtain a certification under this section, a licensee must submit an application to the board on a form provided by the board and must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board that the licensee has completed any of the following:(1) Passage of an examination on the performance of dry needling prepared and administered by a qualified and approved professional testing organization in accordance with section 812.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Completion of a minimum of 24 hours of study in the performance of dry needling under a curriculum approved by the board at a board approved chiropractic college or postgraduate education program, including a minimum of 20 hours in an in-person, hands-on classroom setting.Section 306. Certification to practice animal chiropractic.(a) Certification required.--The board shall certify a qualified licensee to practice animal chiropractic in accordance with this section. A licensee may not practice animal 20260SB1330PN1719 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chiropractic unless the board has issued the licensee a certification under this section.(b) Application and requirements.--To obtain a certification under this section, a licensee must submit an application to the board on a form provided by the board and must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board that the licensee has completed all of the following:(1) Passed an examination on the practice of animal chiropractic prepared and administered by a qualified and approved professional testing organization in accordance with section 812.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Completed a minimum of 50 hours of study in the practice of animal chiropractic under a curriculum approved by the board at a board approved chiropractic college or postgraduate education program, including a minimum of 20 hours in an in-person, hands-on classroom setting.(c) Scope of practice.--A licensee certified under this section may practice chiropractic on an animal only for a type of animal for which the certified licensee has received training.(d) Supervision.--A licensee certified under this section may practice chiropractic on an animal without supervision by a licensed veterinarian.Section 307. Concussion management.(a) Standard of care.--A licensee who assesses, diagnoses or treats a concussed patient, including a student athlete, shall do so in accordance with nationally accepted standards and guidelines on the effective date of this subsection.(b) Continuing education.--A licensee who assesses, 20260SB1330PN1719 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 diagnoses or treats a concussed patient shall complete continuing education that keeps pace with evolving standards and guidelines related to concussion management.(c) Scope of services.--Within the scope of practice, a licensee who provides concussion management services may engage in any of the following:(1) Assess a patient.(2) Diagnose a patient.(3) Treat a patient.(4) Determine whether a patient may return to activities of daily living.(5) Consult with, refer to or collaborate with another licensed health care provider.Section 308. Student athletes.(a) Sports physical examination.--A licensee may perform a comprehensive initial preparticipation physical evaluation and may complete the comprehensive initial preparticipation physical evaluation form of the Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association or may perform another similar evaluation to certify that a student is physically fit to participate in an activity, including practice, interschool practice, scrimmage or contest.(b) Continuing education.--A licensee who performs a sports physical examination or who assesses, diagnoses or treats a concussed student athlete shall maintain continuing education that keeps pace with evolving standards and guidelines related to concussion management.(c) Assessment and clearance.--A licensee may assess and grant clearance to a student athlete to return to participation. For concussion management, a licensee may make an assessment or grant clearance under this subsection only in accordance with 20260SB1330PN1719 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the following:(1) In consultation with a medical doctor, a doctor of osteopathic medicine or a licensee acting within the scope of services under section 307(c).(2) Under referral of a medical doctor, a doctor of osteopathic medicine or a licensee acting within the scope of services under section 307(c).(3) In collaboration with a medical doctor, a doctor of osteopathic medicine or a licensee acting within the scope o f services under section 307(c).(4) Under the supervision of a medical doctor, a doctor of osteopathic medicine or a licensee acting within the scope of services under section 307(c).(d) Exception.--Subsection (c) shall not apply to a licensee who holds any of the following current credentials:(1) Diplomate in chiropractic neurology recognized by the American Chiropractic Neurology Board or the International Board of Chiropractic Neurology.(2) Diplomate in chiropractic sports medicine recognized by the American Chiropractic Board of Sports Physicians.(3) Certified chiropractic sports physician recognized by the American Chiropractic Board of Sports Physicians and listed on the national concussion registry maintained by that organization.(4) Diplomate in orthopedic or neuromusculoskeletal medicine recognized by the International Academy of Neuromusculoskeletal Medicine, formerly the Academy of Chiropractic Orthopedists, and the American Board of Chiropractic Orthopedics.(5) Diplomate in chiropractic rehabilitation recognized 20260SB1330PN1719 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the American Chiropractic Rehabilitation Board.(6) Another diplomate or certification approved by the board.Section 5. Section 501(a) introductory paragraph and (b) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 501. Applications for license.(a) Requirement for licensure.--[An] Except as provided under subsection (a.1), an applicant for a license under this act shall submit satisfactory proof to the board that the applicant meets all of the following:* * *(a.1) Requirements for licensure beginning January 1, 2030.--Beginning January 1, 2030, an applicant for a license shall submit satisfactory proof to the board that the applicant meets all of the following:(1) Is at least 18 years of age.(2) Has successfully completed all of the following examinations, with a score approved by the board:(i) The National Board of Chiropractic Examiners certification examination, Parts I, II, III and IV.(ii) The physiotherapy examination.(iii) Another examination approved by the board. The board may approve another testing organization that is a qualified and approved professional testing organization in accordance with section 812.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(3) Has not been convicted of a felonious act prohibited under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as 20260SB1330PN1719 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction that would constitute a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act if committed in this Commonwealth. This paragraph shall not apply if the applicant demonstrates all of the following to the satisfaction of the board:(i) At least 10 years have elapsed since the date of conviction.(ii) The applicant has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction so that licensure of the applicant would not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of the applicant's patients or the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violations.(iii) The applicant meets the qualifications required under this act. An applicant's statement in the application declaring the absence of a conviction shall constitute satisfactory evidence of the absence of a conviction unless the board has evidence to the contrary. As used in this subparagraph, the term "conviction" includes a judgment, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere.(a.2) Eligibility to sit for certification examination.--Beginning January 1, 2030 , in order to qualify to sit for the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners certification examination, an applicant must meet all of the following:(1) Has graduated from a chiropractic college that is accredited by, or has status with, the Council on Chiropractic Education.20260SB1330PN1719 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Has met the prechiropractic education requirement by satisfying any of the following:(i) Has been granted a bachelor's degree, based upon four academic years of study or through an accelerated bachelor's degree program, by a college or university accredited by the United States Department of Education.(ii) Has successfully completed a minimum of 90 semester hours of undergraduate study at a college or university accredited by the United States Department of Education.(iii) Has successfully completed not less than three academic years of undergraduate study at a college or university accredited by the United States Department of Education prior to enrollment in a chiropractic college. The undergraduate study specified under this paragraph shall meet the entrance requirements of a chiropractic program accredited by the Council on Chiropractic Education.(3) The applicant's chiropractic degree consists of credits earned in the chiropractic program and does not include academic credit for courses from the bachelor's degree.(b) Renewal of licenses.--A license shall be renewed biennially for a period of two years upon payment of the biennial fee, provided that the licensee satisfies the other requirements of this act. Upon receipt of a complete renewal application, the board shall promptly review, process and approve the application. The board shall complete the review, processing and approval no later than 20 days after receipt of the complete renewal application. The board may approve the 20260SB1330PN1719 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renewal despite a minor administrative error or omission on the application if the board determines that the error or omission does not impact patient health or safety. Any person who has failed to renew his license for a period of longer than five years shall be required to apply for a license in accordance with subsection (a) if he desires to resume practicing chiropractic.Section 6. Sections 502 and 503 of the act are repealed:[Section 502. Examination.(a) Admission.--The board shall admit to a standard examination any applicant who has satisfied all of the requirements of section 501 except for the requirement to have passed the examination. The board may, in its discretion, permit a student in good standing in his final semester in an approved chiropractic college to be admitted to the standard examination, provided he meets all the other requirements of this act, but he must have certification of graduation from said college before a license may be granted.(b) Nature and content of examination.--The examination shall be oral, practical and written, upon the principles and technique of chiropractic and shall include the following subjects: anatomy, physiology, histology, chemistry, pathology, physics, bacteriology, diagnosis, hygiene and sanitation, symptomatology, chiropractic analysis, X-ray, chiropractic principles and a practical demonstration of chiropractic technique.(c) When conducted.--Examinations shall be conducted at least twice each year.(d) Testing organization.--All written, oral and practical examinations required under this section shall be prepared and 20260SB1330PN1719 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administered by a qualified and approved professional testing organization in accordance with section 812.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, except that the oral and practical examinations shall not be subject to section 812.1 until such examinations are available from a testing organization.(e) Score.--A license shall be granted to an applicant who meets the requirements of this act and who achieves:(1) an overall score of at least 75% on the entire examination; or(2) an average score of at least 75% on the oral and practical examination and a passing score on the written examination administered by the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners as such passing score is determined by the national board.Section 503. Failure of examination.(a) Second examination.--Any applicant who shall fail any examination shall, after the expiration of six months and within two years, have the privilege of taking a second examination.(b) Subsequent examinations.--The board may adopt regulations governing the eligibility of applicants who have failed to pass two examinations to be admitted to subsequent examinations.]Section 7. Sections 504, 505(a)(4), 506(a)(4), (7), (8) and (19) of the act are amended to read:Section 504. Reciprocity.(a) License without examination.--The board may grant licenses without further examination to individuals from other states and provinces of Canada if all of the following conditions are met:20260SB1330PN1719 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The standards for licensing in such states or provinces are substantially the same as those provided in this act.(2) Similar privileges are accorded persons licensed in this Commonwealth.(3) The applicants hold valid licenses.(4) The applicable rules and regulations prescribed by the board are complied with.(b) Military and spouse licensure.--Within 30 days after receipt of a completed application for licensure, the board shall grant a license without further examination to an applicant who meets all of the following:(1) Is an active duty member of the United States Armed Forces or the spouse of an active duty member of the United States Armed Forces.(2) Holds a current unrestricted license to practice chiropractic issued by another state.(3) Has not committed an act that constitutes grounds for refusal, suspension or revocation of a license unless the board determines that the act should not preclude issuance of a license under this subsection.Section 505. Limited license.(a) Requirements.--The following educational and professional requirements must be met in order to secure a limited license which may be issued to an out-of-State or foreign chiropractic school or college graduate for a period not to exceed one year for the purpose of teaching in an approved graduate chiropractic education program:* * *(4) The applicant must submit [to an oral examination in 20260SB1330PN1719 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 his specialty conducted by a board member or the board's designated representative] a curriculum vitae to the board.* * *Section 506. Refusal, suspension or revocation of license.(a) Reasons enumerated.--The board may refuse to issue a license or may suspend or revoke a license for any of the following reasons:* * *(4) Displaying gross incompetence, negligence or misconduct in carrying on the practice of chiropractic or engaging in an unsafe or harmful technique in the practice of chiropractic.* * *(7) Having a license to practice chiropractic suspended, revoked or refused or receiving other disciplinary action by the proper chiropractic licensing authority of another state, territory, possession or country. The board shall not be required to impose reciprocal discipline under this paragraph if the board or its designee determines that the disciplining licensing authority imposed sufficient discipline or sanctions.(8) Being unable to practice chiropractic with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of illness, drunkenness, excessive use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals or any other type of material, or as a result of any mental or physical condition. In enforcing this paragraph, the board shall, upon probable cause, have authority to compel a chiropractor to submit to a mental or physical examination by physicians approved by the board. A chiropractor may appeal the probable cause determination within 30 days after 20260SB1330PN1719 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 receiving notice of the board's determination. If a chiropractor appeals under this paragraph, the chiropractor shall have the right to a hearing before the board or its designee to contest the determination. Failure of a chiropractor to submit to such examination when directed by the board, unless such failure is due to circumstances beyond his control, or to appeal the probable cause determination within the time period required under this paragraph, shall constitute an admission of the allegations against him, consequent upon which a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. A chiropractor affected under this paragraph shall at reasonable intervals be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate that he can resume a competent practice of chiropractic with reasonable skill and safety to patients.* * *(19) Failing to refer a patient to a licensed practitioner of another branch of the healing arts for consultation or treatment when a diagnosis of such patient indicates that such a referral is appropriate. If a chiropractor makes an appropriate referral, a patient's refusal to present the referral to the licensed practitioner or the licensed practitioner's refusal to accept the referral shall not constitute grounds for discipline of the chiropractor or create liability for the chiropractor.* * *Section 8. Section 507 of the act is repealed:[Section 507. Continuing chiropractic education.(a) Requirement for license renewal.--As a condition for the biennial renewal of a license to practice chiropractic, a 20260SB1330PN1719 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensee shall submit to the board evidence that he has completed at least 24 hours of continuing chiropractic education within the immediately preceding two-year period, provided that this requirement for continuing chiropractic education shall apply for the first time to the renewal of licenses in 1988.(b) Qualifying education.--A licensee may receive credit for only those hours of continuing chiropractic education in a program approved by the board and for only those hours directed toward keeping the licensee apprised of advancements and new developments in chiropractic which build upon the basic courses required to practice chiropractic and which are in the following areas:(1) Anatomy.(2) Physiology.(3) Histology.(4) Chemistry.(5) Pathology.(6) Physics.(7) Bacteriology.(8) Diagnosis.(9) Hygiene and sanitation.(10) Symptomatology.(11) Chiropractic analysis.(12) X-ray.(13) Chiropractic principles.(14) Chiropractic technique.(15) Adjunctive procedures.No credit shall be given for any course in office management or practice building.(c) Application by sponsors.--Prior to receiving board 20260SB1330PN1719 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approval for a program of continuing chiropractic education, a sponsor shall submit to the board, in writing, the following information at least 90 days prior to the date on which the program is scheduled to be presented:(1) Evidence that the sponsor's program would be directed toward keeping the licensee apprised of advancements and new developments in chiropractic which build upon the basic courses required to practice chiropractic and which are in the areas specified in subsection (b).(2) A detailed course outline or syllabus, including such items as methods of instruction and testing materials, if any.(3) A current curriculum vitae of each instructor, speaker or lecturer appearing in the program.(d) Action on application.--The board shall notify each sponsor, in writing, of approval or disapproval of the application within 45 days of the receipt of the application. If an application is disapproved, the board shall detail the reasons for disapproval in order that the sponsor may cure any defect and submit an amended application in a timely manner.(e) Evidence of completion.--Each licensee, in order to qualify for biennial renewal of his license, shall complete a form provided by the sponsor and supplied by the board which contains the name of the licensee, business address, name of the sponsor and instructor, course taken, hours completed, date and place of the continuing education program offered, and a signed statement sworn and attested to by the licensee that the licensee was fully in attendance at the program offered and that the information in such form is true and correct. The licensee shall be responsible for sending this form to the board.20260SB1330PN1719 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Notification.--The board, within 30 days after the effective date of this act, shall notify all licensees subject to this section that they will be required to complete 24 hours of continuing education within the two-year period before the renewal period commencing in 1988 and shall notify such licensees of continuing education required when renewal applications are issued for 1988 and every renewal period thereafter.(g) Approved programs.--A continuing education program offered by a chiropractic college approved in accordance with this act and attended by a licensee must be accepted by the board so long as the course requirements of this section are met.(h) Exceptions.--The board may make exceptions to the continuing education program requirements in emergency or hardship cases on the basis of evidence submitted in proof of an emergency or hardship.]Section 9. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 507.1. Continuing chiropractic education requirements.(a) Continuing education required for renewal.--As a condition of biennial renewal of a license, a licensee shall complete 24 continuing chiropractic education credits during the immediately preceding biennial period.(b) Credit hour.--One continuing chiropractic education credit shall equal 50 minutes of instruction.(c) Professional ethics.--A licensee may apply at least two credits toward the requirement under subsection (a) in the study of professional ethics. As used in this subsection, the term "study of professional ethics" includes patient care services, ethical patient management, advertising, marketing, 20260SB1330PN1719 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recordkeeping, documentation, coding, billing practices and privacy requirements under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 7 Subch. XI Pt. C (relating to administrative simplification) . Section 507.2. Format and limits for continuing chiropractic education.(a) Distance learning limit.--A licensee may complete not more than 12 of the credits required under section 507.1(a) through distance learning approved by the board. The remaining credits required under section 507.1(a) shall be completed through an in-person live didactic learning experience.(b) Hands-on training requirement.--A licensee shall complete at least four credits of in-person training in manipulation techniques, physical rehabilitation or physiotherapeutics to comply with section 507.1(a).(c) Waiver during emergency.--During a declaration of disaster emergency under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(c) (relating to ge neral authority of Governor) , the board may waive the in- person requirements under this section.(d) Maximum credit per day.--The board may not award more than 12 credits for a continuing chiropractic education program that occurs during one calendar day.Section 507.3. Course content and approval.(a) Subject matter.--Continuing chiropractic education may include subject matter taught by an accredited chiropractic school or a college or university accredited by the United States Department of Education or a subject matter tested for licensure and approved by the board.(b) Providers of Approved Continuing Education.--The board may accept a continuing chiropractic education program approved by Providers of Approved Continuing Education. The board may 20260SB1330PN1719 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reject a program approved by Providers of Approved Continuing Education if the board determines that the program meets any of the following:(1) The program focuses on practice building, practice management or practice marketing.(2) The program lacks significant intellectual or practical content that relates primarily to the practice of chiropractic or to the professional responsibilities or ethical obligations of a licensee.(c) Basic coursework excluded.--The board may not grant continuing chiropractic education credit for coursework required for graduation from a chiropractic college or for initial licensure. The board shall grant credit only for postdoctoral coursework designed to build upon basic knowledge or to bring a licensee current on new developments relating to the practice of chiropractic.(d) Other educational programs.--The board may approve an educational program offered by a professional organization or society, a health care profession, a school, a college or university accredited by the United States Department of Education or health care facility for continuing chiropractic education credit if the board determines that the program has significant intellectual or practical content that relates primarily to the practice of chiropractic, chiropractic philosophy or to the professional responsibilities or ethical obligations of a licensee and does not focus on practice building, practice management or practice marketing.(e) Equivalent educational programs.--The board may approve an equivalent educational program for continuing chiropractic education credit, including an examination, a scientific paper, 20260SB1330PN1719 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a professional publication, a scientific presentation, a residency program, a teaching appointment, a research appointment, an advanced degree program, a certification program in a related field, a scientific exhibit, independent study, research or distance learning, if the board determines that the program has significant intellectual or practical content that relates primarily to the practice of chiropractic or to the professional responsibilities or ethical obligations of a licensee and does not focus on practice building, practice management or practice marketing.Section 507.4. Calculation of continuing chiropractic education credits.The board shall calculate continuing chiropractic education credits as follows:(1) For a continuing professional education program of a national or State professional organization, one credit for each 50 minutes of in-class participation.(2) For a course from a college or university accredited by the United States Department of Education, 15 credits for each semester or trimester credit hour earned and 10 credits for each quarter credit hour earned.(3) For a noncredit course, one credit for each 50 minutes of in-class participation.(4) For a distance learning program or other independent study program, one credit for each 50 minutes of participation.(5) For teaching or instructing a course for the first time or teaching a previously taught course if the licensee spent substantial time updating course material, one credit for each hour of instruction or preparation time. The board 20260SB1330PN1719 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may not award more than 12 credits per biennial period under this paragraph. A licensee employed as a full-time teacher or instructor is not eligible for credit under this paragraph.(6) For a scientific paper or professional publication, one credit for each 50 minutes of preparation time up to 12 credits per biennial period. A licensee seeking credit under this paragraph shall submit a copy of the publication to the board with a request for credit. A licensee may request additional credit by submitting the publication to the board with an explanation of exceptional circumstances that the licensee believes justify additional credit. The board shall determine whether to award additional credit on a case-by- case basis and may consider subject matter complexity, length of publication and preparation time.(7) For research and preparation of an examination or service as an examiner for a clinical examination, one credit for each hour of research or examination time up to six credits per biennial period.(8) For a scientific presentation or exhibit, one credit for each hour of preparation or presentation time up to six credits per biennial period.Section 507.5. Sponsor approval and program administration.(a) Sponsor approval.--A program provider seeking approval to sponsor a continuing chiropractic education program shall apply to the board in the manner specified by the board at least 60 days before the date of the program. The application shall include course and program descriptions, instructor qualifications, locations, dates, times and other information required by the board. The board shall issue its determination not later than 30 days after receipt of the application.20260SB1330PN1719 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Sponsor criteria.--A sponsor approved under subsection (a) shall offer a course that meets all of the following:(1) The course is a formal course of learning that contributes directly to the maintenance of professional competence of a licensee.(2) The course is at least one credit in length and the board may award additional credit in increments of one half of a credit.(3) The course is conducted by a qualified instructor or discussion leader.(4) The course content satisfies the requirements under section 507.3.(c) Sponsor records and attendance.--A sponsor approved under subsection (a) shall maintain accurate records of attendance for five years and shall comply with additional requirements specified by the board, including requirements related to verification of attendance.(d) Sponsor disclosures and facilities.--A sponsor approved under subsection (a) shall disclose the objective, prerequisites, experience level, content, required preparation, teaching method and number of credits to prospective participants. A sponsor approved under subsection (a) shall ensure that class s ize and physical facilities are consistent with the teaching methods used.(e) Instructors.--A sponsor approved under subsection (a) shall select and assign qualified instructors. A sponsor approved under subsection (a) shall provide the curriculum vitae of each instructor to the board and shall certify that the sponsor has verified the credentials of each instructor. A sponsor approved under subsection (a) shall notify the board of 20260SB1330PN1719 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an instructor change not later than 20 days after the change.(f) Program evaluation.--A sponsor approved under subsection (a) shall evaluate instructor performance at the conclusion of each program and shall provide a means of program evaluation that includes participant and instructor feedback. The evaluation may include pretests, posttests, questionnaires or oral feedback and shall address whether objectives were met, prerequisites were necessary or desirable, facilities were satisfactory, the instructor was effective, preparation materials were satisfactory and content was timely and effective.(g) Certificates.--A sponsor approved under subsection (a) shall provide a certificate of completion or comparable documentation to each participant that includes dates attended, credits earned, course title, description of content, method of delivery, subject area, sponsor name, instructor name and course location.(h) Sponsor list.--The board shall publish on its publicly accessible Internet website a list of sponsors approved under subsection (a).(i) Material changes.--A sponsor approved under subsection (a) may not alter, amend, update or reconfigure an approved course without permission of the board. If a sponsor approved under subsection (a) alters, amends, updates or reconfigures an approved course, the sponsor shall resubmit the course to the board for approval.(j) Licensee submission for approval.--A licensee may submit a program for approval for continuing chiropractic education credit in the manner specified by the board if the program has not been approved under this section. The board shall notify the 20260SB1330PN1719 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensee in writing of the board's determination.(k) Specialized coursework preapproval.--Coursework required for certification to perform specialized examinations or electrodiagnostic tests shall be preapproved by the board at least 90 days before the course begins. A program provider seeking preapproval shall adhere to the approval process under subsection (a). A licensee seeking preapproval shall apply to the board in the manner specified by the board.Section 507.6. Renewal certification, reporting and audit s. (a) Certification on renewal.--A licensee shall certify on the application for biennial license renewal that the licensee has completed the continuing chiropractic education required under section 507.1(a).(b) Documentation and retention.--A licensee shall maintain evidence of completion of continuing chiropractic education requirements for five years after completion of the credits and shall submit documentation to the board upon request.(c) Random audits.--The board may conduct random audits to determine compliance with sections 507.1, 507.2, 507.3, 507.4 and 507.5.Section 507.7. Exemptions and carryover.(a) New licensee exemption.--A new licensee who completed an accredited graduate chiropractic education program within 12 months before the commencement of the biennial registration period shall not be required to complete the continuing chiropractic education requirements for that biennial period.(b) Carryover of excess credits.--A licensee who completes more than 24 continuing chiropractic education credits during a biennial period may apply not more than eight of the excess credits to the continuing chiropractic education requirement for 20260SB1330PN1719 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the immediately following biennial period only.(c) Inactive or retired status.--A licensee holding an inactive license or a retired license shall be exempt from the continuing chiropractic education requirements. A licensee holding an inactive license or a retired license, or whose license is suspended or revoked, who applies to resume practice shall provide proof of completion of continuing chiropractic education for each biennial period for which the licensee was inactive, retired, suspended or revoked. If the total credits required to become current exceeds 30, the maximum number required shall be 30 credits.(d) Deficiency remediation.--An applicant seeking to resume practice under subsection (c) shall submit to the board a detailed list of all continuing chiropractic education completed to become current. If the board determines that a deficiency exists in a particular area of study, the board may require completion of additional continuing chiropractic education in the area of deficiency before the board reinstates the license to active status.Section 507.8. Extensions, waivers and enforcement.(a) Hardship extensions and waivers.--The board may extend the time for completion of continuing chiropractic education requirements or may waive continuing chiropractic education requirements on an individual basis for hardship, including severe illness, disability or military service.(b) Application for extension or waiver.--A licensee seeking an extension or waiver under subsection (a) shall apply to the board in writing and shall include the specific reasons for the request and supporting documentation. A licensee must apply before expiration of the biennial renewal period and shall 20260SB1330PN1719 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 submit the request to the board office by certified mail with return receipt requested.(c) Effective period and renewal.--An extension or waiver granted under this section shall apply to the biennial period for which it is granted. If the condition requiring an extension or waiver continues into the next biennial period, the licensee shall apply to the board for renewal of the extension or waiver for the next biennial period.(d) Verification and proof.--A licensee shall provide verification and proof of compliance with sections 507.1, 507.2, 507.3, 507.4, 507.5, 507.6 and 507.7 upon request of the board.(e) Noncompliance.--Noncompliance with continuing chiropractic education requirements shall constitute cause for civil penalties imposed under Chapter 7.(f) Repeat noncompliance.--A second or subsequent failure to comply with continuing chiropractic education requirements may constitute professional misconduct and constitutes grounds for discipline, including suspension or revocation of a license.Section 10. Section 508(a) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 508. Professional liability insurance.[(a) Insurance required.--As a condition for obtaining or renewing a license to practice chiropractic in this Commonwealth beginning with the 1988 license renewal period, an applicant shall submit to the board satisfactory evidence that he has obtained professional liability insurance, or that he has established self-insurance for professional liability, in the minimum amount of $100,000 per occurrence and $300,000 per annual aggregate.](a.1) Insurance required.--A chiropractor licensed under 20260SB1330PN1719 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this act and m aintaining a professional practice or having responsibility for patient care shall be covered. * * *(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authorized." Authorized by a government agency to offer chiropractic professional liability insurance products."Covered." T he ongoing maintenance of insurance in an amount of at least $500,000 per occurrence and $1,500,000 per policy year, including extended reporting endorsement coverage for a claims made policy, also known as tail coverage, issued by a carrier or other entity authorized to write chiropractic professional liability insurance in this Commonwealth."Maintaining a professional practice or having responsibility for patient care." The furnishing of professional services to a patient in this Commonwealth, including testing for, diagnosing, offering or furnishing treatment, preventive chiropractic care or consultation relating to chiropractic care, at a location, including an office, even if located in a home or clinic, or through a business entity regardless of ownership of the practice.Section 11. Section 521 of the act is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 521. License required.It shall be unlawful after the effective date of this act for any person in this Commonwealth to engage in the practice of chiropractic or indicate in any manner whatsoever the ability to practice chiropractic unless licensed under the provisions of this act, except that:20260SB1330PN1719 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(3) Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit a chiropractor in the service of the United States Armed Forces, the United States Public Health Service or the Veterans Administration, or a Federal employee, from discharging official duties.(4) A chiropractor licensed in good standing to practice chiropractic in another state is exempt from the licensure requirements of this act while practicing in this Commonwealth if any of the following applies:(i) The chiropractor has a written or oral agreement with a sports team to provide care to team members and coaching staff traveling with the team for a specific sporting event to take place in this Commonwealth.(ii) The chiropractor has been invited by a national sport governing body to provide services to team members and coaching staff at a national sport training center in this Commonwealth or to provide services at an event or competition in this Commonwealth sanctioned by the national sport governing body and both of the following apply:(A) The chiropractor's practice is limited to that required by the national sport governing body.(B) The services provided by the chiropractor are within the area of the chiropractor's competence and within the scope of chiropractic as defined in this act.(5) A chiropractor exempt under paragraph (4) shall be subject to all of the following:(i) The chiropractor may not provide care or 20260SB1330PN1719 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consultation to a person residing in this Commonwealth other than a person described in paragraph (4)(i) or (ii) or as otherwise provided by State law.(ii) The exemption shall be valid as follows:(A) For an exemption under paragraph (4)(i), the exemption shall remain in force while the chiropractor is traveling with the sports team but may not exceed 10 days per sporting event. The board may grant up to 20 additional days per sporting event upon prior request by the chiropractor but the exemption may not exceed 30 days in total.(B) For an exemption under paragraph (4)(ii), the exemption shall remain in force for the period certified by the national sport governing body but may not exceed 30 days.Section 12. Section 525 of the act is amended to read:Section 525. Doctor of Chiropractic and abbreviation.(a) Title.--Any person who has a valid license in accordance with this act may practice chiropractic and use the title ["Doctor of Chiropractic" and the abbreviation "DC."] "Doctor of Chiropractic," "Chiropractic Physician," "Doctor of Chiropractic Medicine" and the abbreviation "DC." (b) Specialty certification.--A licensee may hold oneself out as board certified in a specialty only if the licensee has completed a specialty certification program approved by the American Chiropractic Association, the International Chiropractors Association, the American Chiropractic Board of Sports Physicians, the Federation of Chiropractic Licensing Boards or a similar organization approved by the board. A licensee who has completed an approved specialty certification 20260SB1330PN1719 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program but has not taken the examination may hold oneself out as board eligible.Section 13. Section 526 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 526. Relationship with other branches of the healing arts.* * *(c) Professional entity.--A licensee may form a professional corporation or limited liability company with other licensees or other health care practitioners licensed to provide health care services in this Commonwealth if all of the following apply:(1) The licensing boards that regulate the other health care practitioners do not expressly prohibit the arrangement.(2) The other health care practitioners or another individual with an ownership interest does not hold a controlling interest in the entity that permits the other health care practitioner or individual to direct or interfere with the licensee's independent professional judgment regarding the practice of chiropractic.Section 14. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 528. Opinions and testimony.(a) Causation and standard of care.--A chiropractor who holds current license under this act shall be deemed competent to offer an opinion in a court, administrative agency or other tribunal of this Commonwealth on causation or the standard of care within the scope of chiropractic practice if the testimony is offered to a reasonable degree of chiropractic certainty and an adequate foundation otherwise exists for admission of the testimony.(b) Permanent impairment and disability.--A chiropractor who 20260SB1330PN1719 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 holds a current license under this act shall be deemed competent to offer an opinion in a court, administrative agency or other tribunal of this Commonwealth on permanent impairment or disability if the testimony is within the scope of chiropractic practice, is offered to a reasonable degree of chiropractic certainty and an adequate foundation otherwise exists for admission of the testimony.Section 15. Section 701(a)(2) and (b) of the act are amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 701. Practice of chiropractic without license prohibited.(a) Offense defined.--It shall be unlawful for any person to:* * *(2) Practice or hold himself out as a practitioner of spinal or extraspinal adjustment or manipulation, spinal mobilization or manipulation and mobilization and manipulation of articulations of the [human] body for therapeutic benefit unless he has first fulfilled the requirements of this act and has been licensed by the board or unless he has been licensed or certified in accordance with another act of this Commonwealth.(3) Offer chiropractic opinions in this Commonwealth for the purpose of determining eligibility for health insurance policy benefits relating to chiropractic care, including a workers' compensation utilization review, peer review organization review, third party administrator review, impairment rating review or insurance payment related review, unless the person is duly licensed as a chiropractor and actively practicing in this Commonwealth.20260SB1330PN1719 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Penalty.--A person who violates this section commits a misdemeanor of the third degree. [and shall, upon conviction, for a first offense, be sentenced to a fine not to exceed $1,000, or to imprisonment for not more than six months, or both. A second offense shall be subject to a fine not to exceed $2,000, or imprisonment for a term of six months to one year, or both.]Section 16. Sections 702 introductory paragraph and (3) and 1101(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 702. Violation of other provisions.A person commits a misdemeanor of the third degree [and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $500, or to imprisonment for not more than six months, or both,] if he commits any act declared unlawful by any other provision of this act, other than section 701, or if he:* * *(3) Displays gross incompetence, negligence or misconduct in carrying on the practice of chiropractic or engages in an unsafe or harmful technique in the practice of chiropractic.* * *Section 1101. Fees.(a) Adoption.--The board shall, by regulation, fix the fees required for examination, licensure, renewal of licenses and limited licenses. The board shall waive the initial application fee for an active duty member of the United States Armed Forces and the spouse of an active duty member of the United States Armed Forces.* * *Section 17. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1330PN1719 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930